Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-549
Fish, mollusks, reptiles, crustaceans, and amphibians; permitted acts.

Subsection (1) of section 37-548 shall not apply to:

(1) The importation by a person engaged in the business of buying for the purpose of selling, canning, preserving, processing, or handling for shipments or sale for immediate or future consumption fish, oysters, clams, crabs, shrimp, prawns, lobsters, or other commercial edible aquatic products;

(2) The buying, selling, bartering, importing, exporting, or otherwise disposing of any wildlife produced at any municipal, state, or federal museum, zoo, park, refuge, or wildlife area; and

(3) The importation of fish, mollusks, reptiles, crustaceans, and amphibians intended for exhibition, aquarium, or other totally contained purposes.

This section shall not be construed to allow the importation or possession of a species otherwise protected or regulated by the Game Law.

Laws 1993, LB 830, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-537;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 269;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 80.